Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,166
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-9,166 to 85-9,176 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1086.

For provisions relating to elementary and secondary schools, see sections 79-2,114 to 79-2,124.